Hawaii statutes.
[§256B-5] Hawaii ABLE savings accounts;
terms and conditions. (a) An ABLE savings account established pursuant to
this chapter shall be opened by a designated beneficiary or by a trustee or
guardian of a designated beneficiary who lacks capacity to enter into a
contract; provided that the designated beneficiary shall be an eligible
individual at the time the account is established. Each beneficiary may hold
only one account. The director may establish a nonrefundable application fee
and an annual fee for each account. An application for an account shall be in
the form specified by the director and shall contain:

(1) The name, address, and social security number of
the account owner;

(2) The name, address, and social security number of
the designated beneficiary, if the account owner is the beneficiary's trustee
or guardian;

(3) Certification relating to no excess
contributions; and

(4) Additional information as the director may
require.

(b) Any person may make contributions to an
ABLE savings account after the account is opened, subject to the limitations
imposed by section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or
any rules and regulations adopted by the Secretary and applicable to this
chapter.

(c) Contributions to an ABLE savings account
may be made only in cash. The director or program manager shall reject or
promptly withdraw contributions:

(1) If the contribution is in excess of the limits
established pursuant to subsection (b);

(2) If total contributions cause the value of the
account to be equal to or greater than the account maximum established by the
director. The account maximum must be equal to the account maximum for
postsecondary education savings accounts established pursuant to chapter 256;
or

(3) If the designated beneficiary is not an eligible
individual in the current calendar year.

(d) An account owner may:

(1) Change the designated beneficiary of an account
to an individual who is a member of the family of the prior designated
beneficiary in accordance with procedures established by the director; and

(2) Transfer all or a portion of an account to
another ABLE savings account, the designated beneficiary of which is a member
of the family as defined in section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended.

No account owner shall use an interest in an account
as security for a loan. Any pledge of an interest in an account shall be of no
force and effect.

(e) If there is any distribution from an
account to any individual or for the benefit of any individual during a
calendar year, the distribution shall be reported to the Internal Revenue
Service and to the account owner, designated beneficiary, or distributee to the
extent required by state or federal law.

(f) Statements shall be provided to each
account owner at least four times each year within thirty days after the end of
the three-month period to which a statement relates. The statement shall
identify the contributions made during the preceding three-month period, the
total contributions made to the account through the end of the period, the
value of the account at the end of the period, distributions made during the
period, and any other information that the director requires to be reported to
the account owner. Statements and information relating to accounts shall be
prepared and filed to the extent required by this chapter and any other state
or federal law.

(g) The program shall provide a separate
accounting for each designated beneficiary. [L 2015, c 206, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next